Idaho, session 2025, H0443.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Board of Education
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. OSBE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,000,000 $5,000,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $20,000 0 20,000
TOTAL $20,000 $5,000,000 $5,020,000
II. IT AND DATA MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $140,700 $78,500 $219,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $10,000 $10,000
Miscellaneous Revenue/ School Security Assessment
Fund 12,500 $99,000 111,500
TOTAL $22,500 $99,000 $121,500
GRAND TOTAL $140,700 $121,000 $99,000 $5,000,000 $5,360,700
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of the State Board of Education is hereby increased by one
(1.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. USE OF APPROPRIATED FUNDS. Of the moneys appropriated in
Section 1 of this act for the Public-Private Workforce Capacity Grant, only
projects that meet all of the following criteria will be eligible for fund-
ing: (1) the program must be on the In-Demand Careers List; (2) the program
must be in high demand (measured by number of students on the enrollment
waitlist or percent oversubscription); (3) the project for which funding is
requested must obtain new matching dollars in a ratio of one appropriated
dollar for every matching dollar for Boise State University, Idaho State
University, and the University of Idaho and in a ratio of two appropriated
dollars for every matching dollar for Lewis-Clark State College and the
community colleges; and (4) the project must provide detailed performance
metrics and outcomes as part of the project plan. The Office of the State
Board of Education shall submit an interim report to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee by December 31, 2025, and an end-of-fiscal year
report by June 30, 2026. These reports shall detail all projects funded
along with each project's intended outcomes, return on investment, and per-
formance to date. The format and content of this report will be determined in
consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 4. ACHIEVING CREDIT AND TRANSCRIPT MOBILITY. The Office of
the State Board of Education shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee by December 31, 2025, detailing all appropriated
funds spent for the preceding five fiscal years, including federal and grant
funds, to achieve credit and/or transcript mobility for Idaho students.
This report shall identify outcomes and return on investment of appropriated
funds. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-


sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 5. TRANSITIONING TO OUTCOMES-BASED FUNDING IN HIGHER EDU-
CATION. The Office of the State Board of Education shall develop an out-
comes-based funding model to replace the Enrollment Workload Adjustment
for Idaho's college and universities. The Office of the State Board of
Education shall deliver a written proposal to the Joint Finance-Appropria-
tions Committee by December 31, 2025, with a plan for implementation of the
new funding model in fiscal year 2028 or earlier. The Office of the State
Board of Education shall provide written reports to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee on a quarterly basis detailing progress towards the
outcomes-based funding model. The format and content of this report will be
determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of
the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 6. TRANSITIONING TO OUTCOMES-BASED FUNDING IN HIGHER EDU-
CATION. The Office of the State Board of Education shall develop an out-
comes-based funding model to replace the Enrollment Workload Adjustment for
Idaho's community colleges. The Office of the State Board of Education shall
deliver a written proposal to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by
December 31, 2025, with a plan for implementation of the new funding model
in fiscal year 2028 or earlier. The Office of the State Board of Education
shall provide written reports to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
on a quarterly basis detailing progress towards the outcomes-based funding
model. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Office of the State Board of Education any unexpended and unencumbered
balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Office of the State Board of
Education from the American Rescue Plan Fund for fiscal year 2025 to be used
for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 197, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Board of Education for the
OSBE Administration Program $20,000 from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund to
be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025, for the Credit Mobility Grant.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.


SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 8 of this act shall be in full force and effect
on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.